Utah statutes.
63G-2-306.   Procedure to determine classification.

(1)  If more than one provision of this chapter could govern the classification of a record, the governmental entity shall classify the record by considering the nature of the interests intended to be protected and the specificity of the competing provisions.

(2)  Nothing in Subsection 63G-2-302(2), Section 63G-2-304, or 63G-2-305 requires a governmental entity to classify a record as private, controlled, or protected.

